Utah statutes.
70A-2a-505.   Cancellation and termination and effect of cancellation,
termination, rescission, or fraud on rights and remedies.
(1)  On cancellation of the lease contract, all obligations that are still
executory on both sides are discharged, but any right based on prior default
or performance survives, and the cancelling party also retains any remedy for
default of the whole lease contract or any unperformed balance.
(2)  On termination of the lease contract, all obligations that are still
executory on both sides are discharged, but any right based on prior default
or performance survives.
(3)  Unless the contrary intention clearly appears, expressions of
"cancellation," "rescission," or the like of the lease contract may not be
construed as a renunciation or discharge of any claim in damages for an
antecedent default.
(4)  Rights and remedies for material misrepresentation or fraud include all
rights and remedies available under this chapter for default.
(5)  Neither rescission nor a claim for rescission of the lease contract nor
rejection or return of the goods may bar or be deemed inconsistent with a
claim for damages or other right or remedy.
